src/pp-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! Adposition lexicon
! ===================

! First come the 3 continuation lexica, the division is based on Nickel
! and should probably be revised. Then comes the adpositions themselves.
! The uninflecting ones are pointed to the 3 tag lexica, the Px ones to the
! Px lexica in sme-lex.txt and closed-sme-lex.txt.


LEXICON Pp
+Po:%>0 K ;
+Pr:%>0 K ;
! +Adp:%>0 K ; !Let's try this instead.

LEXICON Postp
+Po:%>0 K ;

LEXICON Prep
+Pr:%>0 K ;


LEXICON Adposition

áigi Postp ;
áigge+Use/NA:áigge Postp ; ! FMT: Add for fin-sme MT 
aisttan+Use/Sub:aisttan Prep ;
aistton+Use/Sub:aistton Prep ;
ala Postp ;
sukte Postp ;
alde+Po:alddi%> PxV ;
nalde+Po:nalddi%> PxV ;
alde Postp ;
asu Postp ;
báldal Postp ;
bálddas+Po:bálda%>s PxC ;
báldda Postp ;
bálddas Postp ;
bearrái Postp ;
belos Postp ;
bottain Postp ;
dássá Postp ;
dievva Postp ;
geaže Pp ;
gieđas Postp ;
goris Postp ;
bálddas+Po:báldda%>st PxC ;
báldii Postp ;
bále Postp ;
báli Postp ;
báras Pp ;
badjin Pp ;
bárrii Pp ;
badjebealde Pp ;
badjel Pp ;
badjelii+Po:badjel%>asa PxV ;
!badjelaš Pp ;  !flyttet til Adv
badjelii Pp ; ! Ill
badjelis Pp ; ! Loc
gárdemađi:gárde#mađi Prep ;
gárdemađe:gárde#mađe Prep ;
badjelis+Po:badjel%>istti PxV ; 
bajábealde:bajá#bealde Pp ;
bajábeale+Use/Sub:bajá#beal Pp; !
bajábeale:bajá#beale Pp ;
bajábeale:bajá#beali Pp ;
bajábeallai:bajá#beallai Pp ;
bajábeallai:bajá#beallái Pp ;
bajil Pp ;
beald:beald9 Pp ;
bealde Pp ;
bealde+Po:bealddi%> PxV ;
beal Postp ;
beale Pp ;
beales Postp ;
beali Postp ; 
bealis Postp ;
bealis+Po:beali%>st PxC ;
beallái+Po:beallá%>s PxC ;
beallai Pp ;
beallai:beallái Pp ;
buorrin Postp ;
guvlui+Use/LexSub:guvlui Postp ; ! FMT: Add one postposition for fin-sme MT
sealggebealde:sealgge#bealde Pp ;
siskkobeale+Use/Sub:siskko#beal Pp; !
siskkobealde:siskko#bealde Pp ;
siskkobeale:siskko#beale Pp ;
siskkobeale:siskko#beali Pp ;
siskkobeallai:siskko#beallai Pp ;
siskkobeallai+Use/Sub:siskko#beallái Pp ;
siskkabeale+Use/Sub:siskka#beal Pp; !
siskkabealde:siskka#bealde Pp ;
siskkabeale:siskka#beale Pp ;
siskkabeale:siskka#beali Pp ; 
siskkabeallai:siskka#beallai Pp ;
siskkabeallai+Use/Sub:siskka#beallái Pp ;
olgešbeale+Use/Sub:olgeš#beal Pp; !
olgešbealde:olgeš#bealde Pp ;
olgešbeale:olgeš#beale Pp ;
olgešbeale:olgeš#beali Pp ;
olgešbeallai:olgeš#beallai Pp ;
olgešbeallai:olgeš#beallái Pp ;
olggobealde+Use/Sub:olgo#bealde Pp; !
olggobeale+Use/Sub:olggo#beal Pp; !
olggobealde:olggo#bealde Pp ;
olggobeale:olggo#beale Pp ;
olggobeale:olggo#beali Pp ;
olggobeallai:olggo#beallai Pp ;
olggobeallai+Use/Sub:olggo#beallái Pp ;
davábealde:davá#bealde Pp ;
davábeale:davá#beale Pp ;
davábeale:davá#beali Pp ;
davábeallai:davá#beallai Pp ;
davábeallai:davá#beallái Pp ;
davágeaže:davá#geaže Pp ;
oarjjabealde:oarjja#bealde Pp ;
oarjjabeale:oarjja#beale Pp ;
oarjjabeale:oarjja#beali Pp ;
oarjjabeallai:oarjja#beallai Pp ;
oarjjabeallai:oarjja#beallái Pp ;
lulábealde:lulá#bealde Pp ;
lulábeale:lulá#beale Pp ;
lulábeale:lulá#beali Pp ;
lulábeallai:lulá#beallai Pp ;
lulábeallai:lulá#beallái Pp ;
lulágeaže:lulá#geaže Pp ;
máttábealde:máttá#bealde Pp ;
máttábeale:máttá#beale Pp ;
máttábeale:máttá#beali Pp ;
máttábeallai:máttá#beallai Pp ;
máttábeallai:máttá#beallái Pp ;
máttágeaže:máttá#geaže Pp ;
nuorttabealde:nuortta#bealde Pp ;
nuorttabeale:nuortta#beale Pp ;
nuorttabeale:nuortta#beali Pp ;
nuorttabeallai:nuortta#beallai Pp ;
nuorttabeallai:nuortta#beallái Pp ;
nuorttageaže:nuortta#geaže Pp ;
duogábeale+Use/Sub:duogá#beal Pp; !
duogábealde:duogá#bealde Pp ;
duogábeale:duogá#beale Pp ;
duogábeale:duogá#beali Pp ;
duogábeallai:duogá#beallai Pp ;
duogábeallai+Use/Sub:duogá#beallái Pp ;
birra+Po:bira%> PxV2 ;
birra Pp ;
bokte Postp ;
bakte Postp ;
bakte+Use/Sub:bakto Postp; !
bokti Postp ;
buohta Postp ;
čađa Pp ;
dáfos Postp ;
dáfus+Use/Sub:dáfun Postp; ! !SOUTH
dáfus Postp ;
dáfus+Po:dáfu%>st PxC ;
dihte Postp ;
dihtii Postp ;
duoge Postp ;
duogi Postp ;
duohkai+Po:duohká%>s PxC ;
duohkai Postp ;
duohkái Postp ;  ! Turi
duohken Postp ;
duohkin Postp ;
duohkin+Po:duohki%>n PxC ;
earet Prep ;
earret Prep ;
ektui Postp ;
!eret Postp ; !Oslos eret, adv
heret+Use/LexSub:heret Postp; ! !Kárášjohka dialect
fárrui Postp ;
fárus Postp ;
gaskal Pp ;
gaskan Pp ;
gaskan+Po:gaska%>n PxCPlstem ; !DuPl only, found in closed-sme-lex.txt
gaskii Postp ;
gaskka Postp ;
gaskkal Prep ;
gaskkas Postp ;
gaskkas+Po:gaskka%>st PxCPlstem ; !as for gaskan
gasku Pp ;
geahčai Pp ;
geahčen Postp ;
geahčil Pp ;
geažes Pp ;
geažis Pp ;
geažil Pp ;
guhkkot Pp ;
guhkkut Pp ;
ládje Postp ;
!guhku Pp ;
gullut Postp ;
guoktil Prep ;
guotkku Postp ;
láhkai Postp ;
láhkai+Use/Sub:láhkái Postp ;
ollodahkii Postp ;
mielas Postp ;
nammii Postp ;
oaivái Postp ;
olggul Postp ;
oskálii Postp ;
rájiin Postp ;
seagis Postp ;
viđa Postp ;
gorrái Postp ;
gulu Postp ;
guora Postp ;
guoras Postp ;
guovdalas Pp ;
guovddáš Pp ;
guovdelas Pp ;
guovdelaš Pp ;
guovdu Pp ;
gurrii Postp ;
gurutbeale+Use/Sub:gurut#beal Pp; !
gurutbeale:gurut#beale Pp ;
gurutbeale:gurut#beali Pp ;
gurutbealde:gurut#bealde Pp ;
gurutbeallai:gurut#beallai Pp ;
gurutbeallai:gurut#beallái Pp ;
hárrái+Use/Sub:hárraj Postp ; !
hárrái:hárráj Pp ;
hárrái+Use/Sub:hárráj9 Pp ; !
hárrái+Po:hárrá%>s PxC ;
haga Postp ; ! awaiting Sub + dis rules for a possible haga+?r. Returning to this, TT.
hahttá Pp ;
labi Pp ;
labis Pp ;
lahka Pp ;
loahpageahčai:loahpa#geahčai Pp ;
loahpageahčen:loahpa#geahčen Pp ;
luhtte+Po:luhti%> PxV ;
luhtte Postp ;
lusa Postp ;
lusa+Po:lusa%> PxV2 ;
mađe Postp ;
mađi Postp ;
mađo Postp ;
mađu Postp ;
maŋil Postp "from behind" ;
maŋis Postp "behind" ;
maŋis+Po:maŋi%>st PxC ;
maŋŋá Pp ;
maŋŋái Postp ;
maŋŋái+Po:maŋŋá%>s PxC ;
maŋŋel:maŋŋil Pp "after" ;
maŋŋegeahčai:maŋŋe#geahčai Pp ;
maŋŋegeahčen:maŋŋe#geahčen Pp ;
maŋŋel Pp ;
maŋŋelis+Use/Sub:maŋŋelis Postp ;
maŋŋelaččas Postp ;
maŋŋel:mannjel Pp ; !dialectal form
mano Postp ;
manu Postp ;
meaddel Pp ;
meaddil Pp ;
meattil Pp ; !Southern dialect
meattá Pp ;
miehtá Pp ;
miel Postp ;
mielde+Po:mielddi%> PxV ;
mielde+Po+Use/Sub:mielddá%> PxV2 ; ! !SOUTH
mielde Postp ;
mielde+Use/Sub:mieldi Postp; !
muttos Postp ;
nala Postp ;
nalde Postp ;
njeaiga Postp ;
njeaigga Postp ;
!oaidnut Postp ; !Pp includes this.
oaidnut Pp ;
oasil Pp ;
oarjjábeale+Use/Sub:oarjjá#beal Pp; !
oarjjageaže:oarjja#geaže Pp ;
olggil Postp ;
olis Pp ;
ollái Pp ;
ovddabeale+Use/Sub:ovda#beal Pp; !
ovdal Pp ;
ovdalis Postp ;
ovdalaččas  Postp ;
ovdii+Po:ovda%>s PxC ;
ovdasii Postp ;
ovddabeale:ovdda#beale Postp ;
ovddabeale+Use/Sub:ovdda#beal Pp; !
ovddabealde:ovdda#bealde Postp ;
ovddabeallai:ovdda#beallai Postp ;
ovddabeallai+Use/Sub:ovdda#beallái Postp ;
ovddabeale:ovdda#beali Postp ;
ovddal Postp ;
ovddas+Use/Sub:ovddan Postp; ! !SOUTH
ovddas Postp ;
ovddas+Po:ovdda%>st PxC ;
ovdii Postp ;
ráigge Postp ; ! FMT: Also Adv, sme-fin
rádjai Postp ;
rádjai:rádjái Postp ;
ráje Postp ;
rájes Postp ;
ráji Postp ;
rájis Postp ;
rastá Pp ;
sadjái Postp ;
sajes Postp ; 
sajis Postp ;
seahká Postp ;
sisa Postp ;
sisa+Po:sisa%> PxV2 ;
siskkil Postp ;
siste Postp ;
siste+Po:sistti%> PxV ;
sivas Pp ;
skivhlái Pp ;
suktii Pp ;
várás Postp ;
várte Pp ;
váste Postp ;
vehkii Pp ;
!veagal Postp ; ! Adv
veagas Postp ;
!veara Postp ; ! Only A?
veardde Pp ;
vehkii Postp ;
vehkiin Postp ;
viđá Postp ;
viđe Postp ;
!viiddu Pp ;
vuđđosin+Use/LexSub:vuđđosin Postp; !
vuođul Postp ;
vuolde+Po:vuolddi%> PxV ;
vuolde Postp ;
vuole Postp ;
vuoli Postp ;
vuolil Pp ;
vuolis+Use/Sub:vuolin Postp; ! !SOUTH
vuolis Postp ;
vuollai+Po:vuollá%>s PxC ;
vuollai Postp ;
vuollai:vuollái Postp ;
vuollel Pp ;
vuollil Pp;
vulobeale+Use/Sub:vulo#beal Pp; !
vulobeale:vulo#beale Pp ;
vulobeale:vulo#beali Pp ;
vulobealde:vulo#bealde Pp ;
vulobeallai:vulo#beallai Pp ;
vulobeallai:vulo#beallái Pp ;
vuolábeale+Use/Sub:vuolá#beal Pp; !
vuolábeale:vuolá#beale Pp ;
vuolábeale:vuolá#beali Pp ;
vuolábealde:vuolá#bealde Pp ;
vuolábeallai:vuolá#beallai Pp ;
vuolábeallai:vuolá#beallái Pp ;
vuostá Pp ;
vuostái Pp ;
ijabealde:ija#bealde Pp ;
ijabeallai:ija#beallai Pp ;
ijabeallai:ija#beallái Pp ;
davvil Pp ;
oarjil Pp ;
nuortal Pp ;
lullil Pp ;
allil Pp ;
bodnil Pp ;
dabbil Pp ;
dábbil Pp ;
dobbil Pp ;
diebbil Pp ;
duobbil Pp ;
fávlil Pp ;
goabbil Pp ;
miehtil Pp ;
máddil Pp ;
seaidnil Pp ;
sealgil Pp ;
siskil Pp ;
soggil Pp ;
uskil Pp ;
várril Pp ;
gáddil Pp ;
vuostil Pp ;
alu Postp ;
gasu Postp ;
govddu Postp ;
guhku Postp ;
losu Postp ;
stuoru Postp ;
viiddu Postp ;
čieŋu Postp ;
galju Postp ;
gievrru Postp ;
